North Carolina statutes. Chapter 108A. Social Services.
Article 3. Social Services Programs.

§ 108A-71.
Authorization of social services programs.

The Department is hereby authorized to accept all grants-in-aid available for programs of social services under the Social Security Act, other federal laws or regulations, State appropriations and other non-federal sources. The Department is designated as the single State agency responsible for administering or supervising the administration of such programs. It is the intent of this Article that programs of social services be administered so that the State and its citizens may benefit fully from any grants-in-aid.

History.

1981, c. 275, s. 1.

Child Welfare/Behavioral Health Pilot Project.

Session Laws
2021-180, s. 9I.12, provides: “(a) From funds appropriated in this act to the Department of Health and Human Services, Division of Social Services, for the 2021 2022 fiscal year, the Division of Social Services, in collaboration with the Division of Mental Health, Developmental Disabilities, and Substance Abuse Services, shall establish a two year child welfare and behavioral health pilot project that will provide easier access to comprehensive health services for children in foster care by (i) creating better continuity of care, (ii) providing an alternative to therapeutic foster care, and (iii) ensuring care and services are available without disruption to a child's foster care placement while accessing services needed to treat the child's trauma. Four counties shall participate in the pilot project, which shall include Davie, Forsyth, Rockingham, and Stokes.

“(b) The purpose of the pilot project is to establish a trauma informed integrated health foster care model to facilitate partnerships between county departments of social services and local management entities/managed care organizations (LME/MCOs) regarding children placed in foster care that will do each of the following:

“(1) Address safety and health needs of children with the application of trauma informed tools.

“(2) Address appropriate preventive and medical care for children placed in foster care.

“(3) Address other social determinants of health, specifically those related to education and social development.

“(4) Meet the goals of Medicaid Transformation, Child Welfare Reform, and the federal Families First Prevention Services Act (Family First Act).

“(5) Provide for collaboration across agencies, including private behavioral health providers, health systems, and agencies of social determinants of health.

“(6) Allow for the development of alternative funding models and service definitions.

“(7) Allow for behavioral health services in family foster homes augmented with mental health services.

“(8) Allow for wraparound services for the child to support a singular, unified goal of children in foster care having a single placement.

“(9) Assign dedicated care coordination to each county social services agency.

“(c) The Division of Social Services and the Division of Mental Health, Developmental Disabilities, and Substance Abuse Services shall submit a progress report on the pilot project established under this section to the Joint Legislative Oversight Committee on Health and Human Services (Committee) by April 1, 2022, and submit a final report to the Committee by October 1, 2023, that, at a minimum, includes each of the following:

“(1) The average cost of providing alternatives to therapeutic foster care.

“(2) An outline of enhanced services offered and developed during the pilot project, including barriers and challenges.

“(3) The outcomes achieved from the pilot project.

“(4) A plan outlining the potential for replication across other counties, including cost modeling recommendations.”

Regional Supervision and Support on Child Welfare Services/CPS Hotline.

Session Laws
2021-180, s. 9I.13, provides: “(a) Of the funds appropriated in this act to the Department of Health and Human Services, Division of Social Services, the sum of nine hundred thousand dollars ($900,000) in recurring funds shall be used to establish up to 15 positions for the (i) regional supervision support model directed by S.L. 2017 41 (Rylan's Law) and (ii) statewide child protective services (CPS) hotline, pursuant to this section.

“(a1) In accordance with the plan submitted by the Social Services Regional Supervision and Collaboration Working Group (SSWG) in its report on March 31, 2019, to the Joint Legislative Oversight Committee on Health and Human Services as required by Rylan's Law, the Department of Health and Human Services (Department) shall establish seven regions for regional supervision of child welfare and social services and begin providing oversight and support within those regions through State regional staff and the central office team by April 1, 2022. To that end, the Department shall continue, pursuant to existing authority, with (i) redeploying positions identified in the report to support regionalization and all managerial staff needed to support regionalization in the central office and (ii) repurposing corresponding operating expenses. The Department shall pursue procurement of physical offices within each of the seven regions beginning in March 2023 and shall prioritize staffing to improve the child welfare system. The Department shall move towards full implementation of a regional model, with offices, by March 1, 2024.

“(b) The Division of Social Services (Division) and the North Carolina Association of Regional Councils of Governments (Councils of Governments) shall explore entering into a memorandum of agreement to (i) utilize Councils of Governments' physical office space and office related needs for Division staff and (ii) facilitate cooperation between regions and evaluate the estimated costs by region for the office space and sample agreements between the Division and the Councils of Governments. The Division shall submit a report to the chairs of the Senate Appropriations Committee on Health and Human Services and the House Appropriations Committee on Health and Human Services by February 1, 2022, on the estimated costs, by region, for office space and sample agreements as described in this subsection.”

Deploy Child Welfare Component of NC FAST.

Session Laws 2021-180, s. 9I.15(a)-(c), provides: “(a) Funds transferred from the Medicaid Transformation Reserve and allocated in Section 9B.2 of this act shall be used by the Department of Health and Human Services, Division of Social Services (Division), to resume deployment of the North Carolina Families Accessing Services through Technology (NC FAST) system as it relates to case management functionality for child welfare. The Division shall deploy the child welfare case management component of the NC FAST system statewide before October 1, 2022, as recommended in the Department of Health and Human Services' "Child Welfare Request for Information and Child Welfare Case Management Legislative Report," dated September 14, 2020, and the Program Evaluation Division's Report, "NC FAST Child Welfare Case Management Software Demonstrates Adequate Functionality but Poor Usability," dated June 12, 2020.

“(b) The Division of Social Services (Division) shall release a request for proposal (RFP) for at least one significant augmentation to the child welfare component of the NC FAST system within 30 days from the date the Division receives federal approval of its procurement plan. The Division shall enter into a contract to augment and enhance the child welfare case management component of the NC FAST system within 150 days of releasing the RFP. The contract shall align with the recommendations developed by the Executive Advisory Committee within the Department, with consideration given to software currently deployed by county departments of social services.

“(b1) Of the funds allocated in accordance with this section to the Division for the child welfare component of the NC FAST system, the sum of three million five hundred thousand dollars ($3,500,000) in nonrecurring funds for each fiscal year of the 2021-2023 fiscal biennium shall be used to ensure that the child welfare case management component of the NC FAST system includes the capability to automate licensing and placements, including external portals for persons applying to be foster care families and for kinship navigator programs, to:

“(1) Increase the number of foster families in North Carolina.

“(2) Expedite the licensing process.

“(3) Assist with meeting the requirements associated with the Family First Prevention Services Act.

“The Division shall release an RFP to automate licensing and placements for the child welfare component of the NC FAST system, enter into a contract for the automation, and ensure that the contract aligns with recommendations developed by the Executive Advisory Committee consistent with the time lines and requirements described in subsection (b) of this section.

“(c) Upon enactment of this section, Part III-N of S.L. 2019-240 is repealed.”

§ 108A-72.
Social services checks payable to decedents.

In the event of the death of a recipient of a cash payment service, any check or checks payable to such recipient but not endorsed prior to such recipient’s death shall be returned to the issuing agency, made void, and reissued to the provider of the service.

History.

1981, c. 275, s. 1.

§ 108A-73.
Services appeals and confidentiality of records.

The provisions of Article 4 on public assistance and social services appeals and confidentiality of records shall be applicable to social services programs authorized under this Article.

History.

1981, c. 275, s. 1.

§ 108A-74.
Counties and regional social services departments required to enter into annual written agreement for all social services programs other than medical assistance; local department failure to comply with the written agreement or applicable law; corrective action; State intervention in or control of service delivery.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, the Secretary may take action in accordance with this section to ensure the delivery of social services programs other than medical assistance in accordance with State laws and applicable rules. As used in this section, the following definitions shall apply:

Board of social services. — The governing body responsible for oversight of the department of social services, includes a county social services board, a regional board of social services, a consolidated human services board, or a board of county commissioners that has assumed the powers and duties of a social services governing board pursuant to

G.S. 153A-77(a)

, whichever applies.

Child welfare services or program. — Child protective services, foster care, and adoption services related to juveniles alleged to be abused, neglected, or dependent as required by Chapter 7B of the General Statutes.

Department of social services. — The department responsible for administration of the social services and programs of public assistance in a county. It includes a county department of social services, a consolidated human services agency, or a regional social services department, whichever applies.

Director of social services. — The person responsible for managing and administering the department of social services, including a county social services director, a regional social services director, or a human services director, whichever applies.

Social services programs other than medical assistance. — Social services and public assistance programs established in this Chapter other than the medical assistance program (Chapter 108A, Article 2, Part 6). This includes, but is not limited to, child welfare programs, adult protective services, guardianship services for adults, and programs of public assistance established in Chapter 108A. It also includes the child support enforcement program, as established in Chapter 110, Article 9.

(a1)

Repealed by Session Laws 2017-41, s. 3.2(a), effective March 1, 2020.

(a2)

The Secretary shall require all counties and regional social services departments to enter into a written agreement each year that specifies mandated performance requirements and administrative responsibilities with regard to all social services programs other than medical assistance, [subject to the following:]

(1)

The mandated performance requirements shall be based upon standardized metrics utilizing data and outcome measures derived from the Social Services System Transparency and Wellness Dashboard and other reliable data sources.

(2)

The administrative responsibilities shall address, at a minimum, staff training, data submission to the Department, and communication with the Department.

(3)

The written agreement may be standardized or may be tailored to address issues in specific jurisdictions.

(4)

The written agreement shall authorize the Department to withhold State or federal funds in the event the department fails to satisfy mandated performance requirements or comply with the terms of the agreement or applicable law.

(a3)

If a department of social services fails to comply with the terms of the written agreement, the mandated performance measures, or other applicable law for three consecutive months or for five months within any consecutive 12-month period for those terms or mandated performance measures that are measured less than annually, or fails to comply for two consecutive 12-month periods for those terms or mandated performance measures that are measured on an annual basis, the Secretary and the department of social services shall enter into a joint corrective action plan within 60 working days. The Secretary may also require a corrective action plan more quickly in urgent circumstances, regardless of whether the circumstances are directly related to a mandated performance requirement specified in the written agreement. The board of social services and the county manager shall be notified of any joint corrective action plan.

(a4)

The corrective action plan shall include each of the following components:

(1)

The duration of the joint corrective action plan, not to exceed 12 months. If the Secretary determines that the department of social services has not shown measurable progress within six months, or at the half-way point if the duration of the plan is less than 12 months, the Secretary may summarily conclude that the department of social services has failed to successfully complete the joint corrective plan and may proceed with steps necessary to temporarily assume administrative responsibilities of the department of social services. If the Secretary determines the department of social services has shown measurable progress within six months, or at the half-way point if the duration of the plan is less than 12 months, the Secretary may extend the joint corrective action plan by six months, but in no case shall a joint corrective action plan exceed 18 months.

(2)

The performance requirements for the department of social services that constitute successful completion of the joint corrective action plan.

(3)

A schedule and plan for providing updates to the board of social services and county manager regarding the department’s progress implementing the corrective action plan.

(4)

An acknowledgement that failure to successfully complete the joint corrective action plan shall result in temporary assumption of all or part of the department of social services administration.

If the Secretary determines that a department of social services has failed to successfully complete the joint corrective action plan, then the Secretary shall give the board of county commissioners, the department of social services, the county manager, and the board of social services at least 30 days’ notice that the Secretary, through the Division of Social Services, intends to temporarily assume all or part of the department’s socials services administration in accordance with subsection (c) of this section. In a regional department of social services, notice shall be provided to boards of county commissioners and county managers for all counties served by the region.

Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, if a department of social services fails to successfully complete its joint corrective action plan, the Secretary shall direct the Division of Social Services to temporarily assume all or part of the department’s social services administration no later than 30 calendar days after providing notice as required by subsection (b) of this section. During the period the Secretary assumes administration of the social services program, the following shall occur:

The Secretary, through the Division of Social Services shall administer all or part of the social services program in a county or region. Administration by the Secretary may include direct operation by the Department, including supervision of program staff or contracts for operation, to the extent permitted by federal law.

The department of social services shall be divested of administrative authority for any component of the program the Secretary assumes.

The director of social services shall be divested of all service delivery powers conferred upon the director by

G.S. 108A-14

and other applicable State law as it pertains to the programs or services to be assumed. The Secretary may assign any of the powers and duties of the director of social services to an employee of the Department or a contractor, as the Secretary deems necessary and appropriate to continue the provision of services in the county. If the local director of social services has delegated any authority to staff pursuant to

G.S. 108A-14(b)

, delegated authority shall remain in effect until the Secretary, or the Secretary’s designee, specifically revokes the delegation.

The Secretary shall direct and oversee the expenditure of all funding for the administration of the components of the program assumed by the Secretary.

The county shall not withdraw funds previously obligated or appropriated for program administration and services. The county shall continue to pay the county’s or region’s nonfederal share for the program services and administration.

The Secretary shall work with the county and the department of social services to develop a plan for the department to resume program administration.

The Secretary shall inform the appropriate board or boards of county commissioners, the county manager or managers, the director of social services, and the board of social services of key activities and ongoing concerns during the temporary assumption of social services program administration.

(c1)

Upon the Secretary’s determination that the department of social services is able to meet performance requirements and that program administration responsibilities should be restored to the department of social services, the Secretary shall notify the board of county commissioners, the department of social services, the county manager, and the board of social services that the temporary assumption of program administration will be terminated and the effective date of the termination. Upon termination, the department of social services shall resume its full authority to administer the program or programs that were assumed.

through (g) Repealed by Session Laws 2017-41, s. 3.2(a), effective March 1, 2020.

(h)

If the Secretary determines that a county department of social services is not providing child protective, foster care, or adoption services in accordance with State law and with applicable rules adopted by the Social Services Commission, or fails to demonstrate reasonable efforts to do so, and the failure to provide the services poses a substantial threat to the safety and welfare of children in the county who receive or are eligible to receive the services, then the Secretary, after providing written notification of intent to the chair of the county board of commissioners, to the chair of the county board of social services, and to the county director of social services, and after providing them with an opportunity to be heard, shall withhold funding for the particular service or services in question and shall ensure the provision of these services through contracts with public or private agencies or by direct operation by the Department of Health and Human Services.

(i)

In the event that the Secretary assumes control of service delivery pursuant to subsection (h) of this section, the county director of social services shall be divested of all service delivery powers conferred upon the director by

G.S. 108A-14

and other applicable State law as the powers pertain to the services in question. Upon assumption of control of service delivery, the Secretary may assign any of the powers and duties of the county director of social services to the Director of the Division of Social Services of the Department of Health and Human Services or to a contractor as the Secretary deems necessary and appropriate to continue the provision of the services in the county.

(j)

In the event the Secretary takes action under this section, the Department of Health and Human Services shall, in conjunction with the county board of commissioners, the county board of social services, and the county director of social services, develop and implement a corrective plan of action. The Department of Health and Human Services shall also keep the chair of the county board of commissioners, the chair of the county board of social services, and the county director of social services informed of any ongoing concerns or problems with the delivery of the services in question.

(k)

Upon the Secretary taking action pursuant to subsection (h) of this section, county funding of the services in question shall continue and at no time during the period of time that the Secretary is taking action shall a county withdraw funds previously obligated or appropriated for the services. Upon the Secretary’s assumption of the control of service delivery, the county shall also pay the nonfederal share of any additional cost that may be incurred to operate the services in question at the level necessary to comply fully with State law and Social Services Commission rules.

(
l
)

During the period of time that the Secretary is taking action pursuant to subsection (h) of this section, the Department of Health and Human Services shall work with the county board of commissioners, the county board of social services, and the county director of social services to enable service delivery to be returned to the county if and when the Secretary has determined that services can be provided by the county in accordance with State law and applicable rules.

History.

1997-390, s. 10; 1997-443, s. 11A.118(a); 2017-41, ss. 3.1(a), 3.2(a); 2017-41, s. 40(a)-(c); 2019-240, s. 12(a)-(d).

§ 108A-75.
Report of oversight of social services programs.

The Department shall report to the Joint Legislative Oversight Committee on Health and Human Services (Committee) by August 1 of every year regarding oversight of the local administration of social services programs other than medical assistance.

The reports shall include, at a minimum:

A copy of the template for the written agreement required by

G.S. 108A-74(a1)

.

An evaluation of the implementation of the requirement for a written agreement.

A summary of any oversight action taken by the Department pursuant to the agreement or

G.S. 108A-74

, including a list of any federal or State funds that were withheld as a result of the State’s oversight.

Beginning August 1, 2021, the reports required in this section shall also include:

A summary [of] the circumstances involved with the issuance of any corrective action plans or temporary assumption of local program administration by the State pursuant to

G.S. 108A-74

.

Recommendations for legislative changes related to the authority of the State to supervise local social services administration pursuant to

G.S. 108A-74

and related laws.

History.

2017-41, s. 3.3.